Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-149
Rate averaging.

In setting rates for interexchange service, telecommunications companies that provide interexchange service shall continue to average their rates for all interexchange service on a statewide basis unless the commission, upon application and hearing, orders otherwise. This section shall not prohibit volume discounts or other discounts based on reasonable business purposes. With regard to interexchange service, nothing in the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation Act shall preempt or affect any right, liability, cause of action, duty, or obligation arising from any law with regard to unfair business practices or anticompetitive activity.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 48.